Utah statutes.
70A-9a-704.    Security interest unperfected before effective date.

A security interest that is enforceable immediately before this act takes effect but which would be subordinate to the rights of a person that becomes a lien creditor at that time:

(1)  remains an enforceable security interest for one year after this act takes effect;

(2)  remains enforceable thereafter if the security interest becomes enforceable under Section 70A-9a-203 when this act takes effect or within one year thereafter; and

(3)  becomes perfected:

(a)  without further action, when this act takes effect if the applicable requirements for perfection under this act are satisfied before or at that time; or

(b)  when the applicable requirements for perfection are satisfied if the requirements are satisfied after that time.



Enacted by Chapter 252, 2000 General Session

